Missouri, session 2026, SB947.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 442, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 442.593, to read as
follows:
442.593. 1. After the effective date of this act, an
alien, foreign business, or foreign government shall not
acquire any real estate, including agricultural land, in the
state for any purpose within fifty miles from:
(1) Any reservation, post, arsenal, proving ground,
range, mine field, camp, base, airfield, fort, yard,
station, district, or area of the Armed Forces of the United
States; or
(2) Any commercial establishment engaged in the
development or manufacture of classified military or naval
arms, munitions, equipment, designs, ships, aircraft, or
vessels for the Armed Forces of the United States.
2. Any alien, foreign business, or foreign government
who acquired real estate under this section prior to the
effective date of this act shall divest itself of the real
estate.

SB 947 2
3. The attorney general shall enforce provisions of
this section. Any individual may report violations of the
provisions of this section to the attorney general. If the
attorney general believes that a violation occurred, the
attorney general shall commence a civil action in a court of
competent jurisdiction.
4. The attorney general shall file a notice of the
pendency of the action with the recorder of deeds of each
county in which any portion of the real estate under this
section is located.
5. If the court finds that a violation of this section
has occurred, the court shall enter an order so declaring
and shall file a copy of the order with the recorder of
deeds of each county in which any portion of the real estate
under this section is located. The court shall order the
owner to divest himself of the real estate. The owner shall
comply with the order within one year. Any real estate not
divested within the one-year period under this subsection
shall be ordered sold by the court at a public sale in the
manner prescribed by law for the foreclosure of a mortgage
on real estate for default in payment.
Section B. Because of the dangers of foreign ownership
of real estate located close to military installations,
section A of this act is deemed necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public health, welfare, peace, and
safety, and is hereby declared to be an emergency act within
the meaning of the constitution, and section A of this act
shall be in full force and effect upon its passage and
approval.
✓